Massachusetts, session 194th, H5030.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 184 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking section 24
and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 24. When any owner of land or of any interest in such land, signs an instrument
in writing conveying or purporting to convey their land or any interest therein, or in any manner
affecting or purporting to affect their title thereto or an interest therein, and the instrument,
whether or not entitled to record or registration, is recorded or registered and indexed in the
registry of deeds or registered land district for the district wherein such land is situated, and a
period of ten years elapses after the instrument is accepted for record or registration, and the
instrument or the record or registration thereof because of defect, irregularity or omission fails to
comply in any respect with any requirement of law relating to seals, corporate or individual, to
the form of grantor clause in which a person purports to grant, mortgage, assign, release or
discharge an interest in real property as representative of or on behalf of a person, trust or entity
who owns or holds such interest and is also named in the grantor clause, to the validity of
of 3

acknowledgment, to a certificate of acknowledgment, witnesses, attestation, proof, method or
form of execution, or time of execution, to recitals of consideration, residence, address, or date,
to the authority of a person executing such an instrument on behalf of an individual under a
power of attorney, to the method by which an individual under a power of attorney executes such
an instrument on behalf of the principal, or to the authority of a person executing such an
instrument on behalf of a trust or entity and purporting to hold the office or position of trustee,
manager, partner, president, vice president, treasurer or other similar office or position, including
assistant to any such office or position, or otherwise purporting to be an authorized signatory for
such trust or entity, including under a power of attorney on behalf of such trust or entity, such
instrument and the record thereof shall, notwithstanding any or all of such defects, irregularities
and omissions, be effective for all purposes to the same extent as though the instrument and the
record thereof had originally not been subject to the defect, irregularity or omission, or to the
form of grantor clause in which a person purports to grant, mortgage, assign, release or discharge
an interest in real property in a capacity other than that in which such person actually owns or
holds such interest, unless within said period of ten years a proceeding is commenced on account
of the defect, irregularity or omission, and notice thereof pursuant to section 15 of this chapter is
duly recorded or registered as appropriate and indexed and noted on the margin thereof under the
name of the signer of the instrument, the owner or holder of the affected interest at the time of
the recording or registration of the instrument and the record owner or holder of the interest at
the time of the filing of such notice and, in the event of such proceeding, unless relief is thereby
in due course granted.
SECTION 2. The provisions of this Act shall take effect January 1, 2027 and shall apply
to instruments and documents recorded or registered before, on or after said date, except as to
of 3

any such instruments or documents for which a court proceeding challenging the effectiveness or
validity of any such instrument or document and the title derived therefrom has been commenced
pursuant to this section as in effect prior to such effective date.
of 3